Nevada, session 83, AB122.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 247.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.540 1. The following persons may request that the
personal information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS
247.520 that is contained in the records of a county recorder be kept
confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
-
*AB122*

– 2 –
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any person employed by a law enforcement agency, as
defined in NRS 289.010, or by the office of a prosecutor within
this State who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to the administration or support
of the law enforcement agency or office of a prosecutor, including,
without limitation, emergency dispatch operations, collection or
maintenance of records or evidence, investigative tasks, victim
advocacy or general administrative duties.
(i) Any state or county public defender.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(m)] (n) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive.
[(n)] (o) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
-
*AB122*

– 3 –
[(o)] (p) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 247.520 that is contained in the
records of a county recorder be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(e) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 2. NRS 250.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.140 1. The following persons may request that personal
information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS 250.120 that is
contained in the records of a county assessor be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
-
*AB122*

– 4 –
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any person employed by a law enforcement agency, as
defined in NRS 289.010, or by the office of a prosecutor within
this State who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to the administration or support
of the law enforcement agency or office of a prosecutor, including,
without limitation, emergency dispatch operations, collection or
maintenance of records or evidence, investigative tasks, victim
advocacy or general administrative duties.
(i) Any state or county public defender.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(m)] (n) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive.
[(n)] (o) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(o)] (p) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 250.120 that is contained in the
records of a county assessor be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
-
*AB122*

– 5 –
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(e) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.908 1. The following persons may request that personal
information contained in the records of the Secretary of State or a
county or city clerk be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any person employed by a law enforcement agency, as
defined in NRS 289.010, or by the office of a prosecutor within
this State who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to the administration or support
of the law enforcement agency or office of a prosecutor, including,
without limitation, emergency dispatch operations, collection or
-
*AB122*

– 6 –
maintenance of records or evidence, investigative tasks, victim
advocacy or general administrative duties.
(i) Any state or county public defender.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possess specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(m)] (n) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive.
[(n)] (o) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
-
*AB122*

– 7 –
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(e) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB122*